Illinois, session 104th, SB2152.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)7    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 8Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 9provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 10covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 11Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 12health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 13Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 14356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 15356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 16356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 17356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 18356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 19356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 20356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, and 356z.77 of the 21Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits must 22comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 370c, and 23370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code, and   SB2152- 2 -LRB104 11051 BAB 21133 b1the Prior Authorization Reform Act. The program of health 2benefits shall provide the coverage required under Section 3356m of the Illinois Insurance Code and, for the employees of 4the State Employee Group Insurance Program only, the coverage 5as also provided in Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department 6of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section 7with respect to Sections 370c and 370c.1 of the Illinois 8Insurance Code and the Prior Authorization Reform Act; all 9other requirements of this Section shall be enforced by the 10Department of Central Management Services.11    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 12any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 13with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 14Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 15Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 16whatever reason, is unauthorized. 17(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 18102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 191-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-768, 20eff. 1-1-24; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 21102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 221-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, 23eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 24103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 258-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 26eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25;   SB2152- 3 -LRB104 11051 BAB 21133 b1103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 21-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 3    Section 10. The Prior Authorization Reform Act is amended 4by changing Sections 10, 50, and 65 as follows: 5    (215 ILCS 200/10)6    Sec. 10. Applicability; scope. This Act applies to health 7insurance coverage as defined in the Illinois Health Insurance 8Portability and Accountability Act, policies issued or 9delivered to persons who are enrolled in the State Employees 10Group Health Insurance Program to the extent required under 11Section 6.11 of the State Employees Group Insurance Act of 121971, and policies issued or delivered in this State to the 13Department of Healthcare and Family Services and providing 14coverage to persons who are enrolled under Article V of the 15Illinois Public Aid Code or under the Children's Health 16Insurance Program Act, amended, delivered, issued, or renewed 17on or after the effective date of this Act, with the exception 18of employee or employer self-insured health benefit plans 19under the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 201974, health care provided pursuant to the Workers' 21Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational Diseases Act, 22county, municipal, and State, employee, unit of local 23government, or school district health plans. This Act does not 24diminish a health care plan's duties and responsibilities   SB2152- 4 -LRB104 11051 BAB 21133 b1under other federal or State law or rules promulgated 2thereunder. This Act is not intended to alter or impede the 3provisions of any consent decree or judicial order to which 4the State or any of its agencies is a party.5(Source: P.A. 102-409, eff. 1-1-22.) 6    (215 ILCS 200/50)7    Sec. 50. Limitations on Review of prior authorization 8requirements. 9    (a) A health insurance issuer shall not require 10periodically review its prior authorization requirements and 11consider removal of prior authorization where a covered 12medication, with the exception of benzodiazepines or Schedule 13II narcotic drugs requirements: 14        (1) is where a medication or procedure prescribed for 15    the management and treatment of multiple sclerosis, 16    rheumatoid arthritis, systemic lupus erythematosus, 17    diabetes type 1, diabetes type 2, or pre-diabetes is 18    customary and properly indicated or is a treatment for the 19    clinical indication as supported by peer-reviewed medical 20    publications; and or21        (2) is for a patient patients currently managed with 22    an established treatment regimen for at least 12 months.23    (b) Nothing in this Section prevents a health care plan 24from denying an enrollee coverage or imposing a prior 25authorization requirement if the United States Food and Drug   SB2152- 5 -LRB104 11051 BAB 21133 b1Administration has issued a statement about the drug that 2calls into question the clinical safety of the drug, the drug 3manufacturer has notified the United States Food and Drug 4Administration of a manufacturing discontinuance or potential 5discontinuance of the drug as required by Section 506C of the 6Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, as codified in 21 U.S.C. 7356c, or the drug manufacturer has removed the drug from the 8market.9    (c) Except to the extent required by medical exceptions 10processes for prescription drugs set forth in Section 45.1 of 11the Managed Care and Patient Rights Act, nothing in this 12Section shall require a policy to cover any care, treatment, 13or services for any health condition that the terms of 14coverage otherwise completely exclude from the policy's 15covered benefits without regard for whether the care, 16treatment, or services are medically necessary. 17(Source: P.A. 102-409, eff. 1-1-22.) 18    (215 ILCS 200/65)19    Sec. 65. Length of prior authorization approval for 20treatment for chronic or long-term conditions. If a health 21insurance issuer requires a prior authorization for a 22recurring health care service or maintenance medication for 23the treatment of a chronic or long-term condition other than 24those specified in Section 50, the approval shall remain valid 25for the lesser of 12 months from the date the health care   SB2152- 6 -LRB104 11051 BAB 21133 b1professional or health care provider receives the prior 2authorization approval or the length of the treatment as 3determined by the patient's health care professional. This 4Section shall not apply to the prescription of benzodiazepines 5or Schedule II narcotic drugs, such as opioids. This Section 6does not apply to Section 6.11C of the State Employees Group 7Insurance Act of 1971. Except to the extent required by 8medical exceptions processes for prescription drugs set forth 9in Section 45.1 of the Managed Care Reform and Patient Rights 10Act, nothing in this Section shall require a policy to cover 11any care, treatment, or services for any health condition that 12the terms of coverage otherwise completely exclude from the 13policy's covered benefits without regard for whether the care, 14treatment, or services are medically necessary.15(Source: P.A. 102-409, eff. 1-1-22.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 171, 2027.